Missouri, session 2026, HB1905.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 178.530, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 178.530, to read as follows:
178.530. 1. The state board of education shall establish standards and annually
inspect, as a basis for approval, all public prevocational, vocational schools, State Technical
College of Missouri, departments and classes receiving state or federal moneys for giving
training in agriculture, industrial, home economics and commercial subjects and all schools,
departments and classes receiving state or federal moneys for the preparation of teachers and
supervisors of such subjects. The public prevocational and vocational schools, State
Technical College of Missouri, departments, and classes, and the training schools,
departments and classes are entitled to the state or federal moneys so long as they are
approved by the state board of education, as to site, plant, equipment, qualifications of
teachers, admission of pupils, courses of study and methods of instruction. All disbursements
of state or federal moneys for the benefit of the approved prevocational and vocational
schools, State Technical College of Missouri, departments and classes shall be made
semiannually. The school board of each approved school or the governing body of State
Technical College of Missouri shall file a report with the state board of education at the times
and in the form that the state board requires. Upon receipt of a satisfactory report, the state
board of education shall certify to the commissioner of administration for his approval the
amount of the state and federal moneys due the school district or State Technical College of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1905 2
Missouri. The amount due the school district shall be certified by the commissioner of
administration and proper warrant therefor shall be issued to the district treasurer or State
Technical College of Missouri.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, the state board of
education shall establish standards for agricultural education that may be adopted by a private
school accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as
an accreditor of private schools that wishes to provide quality vocational programming
outside the requirements of, but consistent with, the federal Vocational Education Act. Such
standards shall be sufficient to qualify a private school to apply to the state chapter for
approval of a local chapter of a federally chartered national agricultural education association
on a form developed for that purpose by the department of elementary and secondary
education without eligibility to receive state or federal funding for agricultural vocational
education. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to create eligibility for a
private school to receive state or federal funding for agricultural vocational education, but
shall not prohibit a private school from receiving state or federal funds for which such private
school would otherwise be eligible for agricultural vocational education. Any such private
school shall reimburse the department annually for the cost of oversight and maintenance of
the program.
3. (1) The department of elementary and secondary education, through its
agricultural education section, shall be authorized to establish a pilot program, beginning in
the 2020-21 school year and ending on June thirtieth of the 2026-27 school year, to
provide for agricultural education in elementary schools in the state. [The purpose of the pilot
program shall be to determine whether and how to implement an elementary agricultural
education program statewide.] For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school
years, the pilot program established in this subsection may become a program
implemented in all elementary schools in the state.
(2) [The department, through its employees who work in the agricultural education
section, is authorized to select from among applications submitted by the public elementary
schools a minimum of sixteen public elementary schools for participation in the pilot
program. The department shall develop an application process for public elementary schools
to apply to participate in the pilot program. The local school board for each elementary
school selected to be in the pilot program shall agree to implement and fully fund an
elementary agricultural education program in such school and to continue to provide such
elementary agricultural education program for a period no shorter than three years. The local
school district may employ an agricultural education teacher to provide such program for the
elementary school.

HB 1905 3
(3) The department, through its employees who work in the agricultural education
section, and local school districts shall collaborate to establish the instructional model for
each elementary agricultural education program. Such instructional model shall be grade-
appropriate and include instruction in an organized classroom, collaborative learning
experiences through investigation and inquiry, including laboratory and site-based learning
activities, and personal, leadership, and career development opportunities.
(4) The department, through its agricultural education section, shall provide for a
program evaluation regarding the success and impact of the pilot program upon completion of
the third year of the pilot program and shall report the results of such evaluation to the
relevant house and senate committees on agriculture and education.
4.] The department shall maintain an adequate number of full-time employees,
certified in agricultural education and distributed regionally throughout the state, to provide
accountability for program delivery of agricultural education, to continue to develop and
maintain pertinent agricultural education instructional models and standards, to assist local
school districts on matters related to agricultural education, and to coordinate regional and
statewide activities supporting K-12 agricultural education programming.
[5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require public elementary schools to
participate in the pilot program.] (3) The requirements of section 160.514 shall not apply
to this subsection.
✔